District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.07

Duties of support enforcement agency.

(a)

A support enforcement agency of the District, upon request, shall provide services to a petitioner in a proceeding under this chapter.

(b)

A support enforcement agency of the District that is providing services to the petitioner shall:

(1)

Take all steps necessary to enable an appropriate tribunal in the District or another state to obtain jurisdiction over the respondent;

(2)

Request an appropriate tribunal to set a date, time, and place for a hearing;

(3)

Make a reasonable effort to obtain all relevant information, including information as to income and property of the parties;

(4)

Within 5 days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after receipt of a notice in a record from an initiating, responding, or registering tribunal, send a copy of the notice to the petitioner;

(5)

Within 5 days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after receipt of a communication in a record from the respondent or the respondent’s attorney, send a copy of the communication to the petitioner; and

(6)

Notify the petitioner if jurisdiction over the respondent cannot be obtained.

(c)

A support enforcement agency of the District that requests registration of a child-support order in the District for enforcement or for modification shall make reasonable efforts:

(1)

To ensure that the order to be registered is the controlling order; or

(2)

If 2 or more child-support orders exist and the identity of the controlling order has not been determined, to ensure that a request for such a determination is made in a tribunal having jurisdiction to do so.

(d)

A support enforcement agency of the District that requests registration and enforcement of a support order, arrears, or judgment stated in a foreign currency shall convert the amounts stated in the foreign currency into the equivalent amounts in dollars under the applicable official or market exchange rate as publicly reported.

(e)

A support enforcement agency of the District shall issue or request a tribunal of the District to issue a child-support order and an income-withholding order that redirect payment of current support, arrears, and interest if requested to do so by a support enforcement agency of another state pursuant to § 46-303.19.

(f)

This chapter does not create or negate a relationship of attorney and client or other fiduciary relationship between a support enforcement agency or the attorney for the agency and the individual being assisted by the agency.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 307, 42 DCR 6748
July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(g), 45 DCR 2924
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(7), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.7.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, in the lead-in language of subsec. (b), substituted “agency of the District” for “agency” and deleted “as appropriate”; in par. (b)(4), substituted “notice in a record” for “written notice”; in par. (b)(5), substituted “communication in a record” for “written communication”; redesignated subsec. (c) as subsec. (f); and added subsecs. (c), (d), and (e).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(g) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2785).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(g) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151).
For temporary addition of § 30-343.7a 1981 Ed., see § 2(h) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(g) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 307 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).